Washington statutes.
RCW 39.50.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Governing body" means the legislative authority of a municipal corporation by whatever name designated;

(2) "Local improvement district" includes local improvement districts, utility local improvement districts, road improvement districts, and other improvement districts that a municipal corporation is authorized by law to establish;

(3) "Municipal corporation" means any city, town, county, water-sewer district, school district, port district, public utility district, metropolitan municipal corporation, public transportation benefit area, park and recreation district, irrigation district, fire protection district or any other municipal or quasi municipal corporation described as such by statute, or regional transit authority, except joint operating agencies under chapter 43.52 RCW;

(4) "Ordinance" means an ordinance of a city or town or resolution or other instrument by which the governing body of the municipal corporation exercising any power under this chapter takes formal action and adopts legislative provisions and matters of some permanency; and

(5) "Short-term obligations" are warrants, notes, capital leases, or other evidences of indebtedness, except bonds.

[ 2001 c 299 s 16; 1999 c 153 s 54; 1998 c 106 s 8; 1985 c 332 s 8; 1982 c 216 s 2.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.